Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2301
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-2301 to 71-2305 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Prostitution Intervention and Treatment Act.

Laws 2006, LB 1086, § 1.